Hawaii statutes.
§431:10H-228 [Filing requirements;
advertisements.] (a) Every insurer, health care service plan, or other
entity providing long-term care insurance or benefits in this State shall
provide a copy of any long-term care insurance advertisement intended for use
in this State through written, radio, or television media to the commissioner
for review or approval by the commissioner to determine compliance with this
article. All advertisements subject to this section shall be retained by the
insurer, health care service plan, or other entity for at least three years
from the date the advertisement was first used.

(b) The commissioner may exempt from the
requirements of this section any advertising form or material when, in the
commissioner's opinion, this requirement may not reasonably be applied. [L
1999, c 93, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 81, §7]

Revision Note

Subsection (b) redesignated pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next